Maryland, session 2026, SB0840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Authority” means the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(3) (i) “Electricity generating facility” means a facility that is designed
to generate electricity to be supplied to the State’s electrical grid.
(ii) “Electricity generating facility” includes:
1. a nuclear power facility;
2. a hydroelectric facility;
3. a fossil fuel powered facility;
4. a solar generating facility;
5. a wind generating facility; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0840*

SENATE BILL 840
6. a geothermal generating facility.
(4) “PJM region” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities
Article.
(5) “Program” means the Power Plant Research Program established under
§ 3–303 of the Natural Resources Article.
(6) “Subcabinet” means the Governor’s Energy Subcabinet as established
by Executive Order 01.01.2025.27.
(b) (1) (i) On or before October 1, 2027, the Program shall study and make
recommendations to the Subcabinet for 5 to 10 sites in the State that are suitable for rapid
development of an electricity generating facility with a cumulative capacity of more than
3,000 megawatts.
(ii) In making recommendations, the Program shall prioritize sites
that would accommodate the highest generation capacity.
(2) In carrying out the study, the Program shall consult with:
(i) the Maryland Energy Administration;
(ii) the Department of Commerce;
(iii) the Department of the Environment;
(iv) the Department of Planning; and
(v) the Strategic Energy Planning Office.
(c) The Subcabinet shall:
(1) assess the Program’s recommendations; and
(2) recommend to the Authority the sites identified by the Program for
which the Authority should complete feasibility studies.
(d) On or before December 1, 2027, the Subcabinet shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy,
and the Environment, and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
(e) On or before June 30, 2028, the Authority shall:

SENATE BILL 840 3
(1) complete a feasibility study for each site recommended by the
Subcabinet; and
(2) submit to the Legislative Policy Committee, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, and the Board of Public Works, the feasibility
study and a description of how the planned electricity generating facility for each planned
electricity generating facility:
(i) will provide for the needs of Marylanders, Maryland businesses,
hospitals, schools, and all other electricity users in the State;
(ii) will provide electricity at reasonable prices that are comparable
to prices paid in surrounding states;
(iii) is consistent with the State’s commitment to promote clean air,
clean water, and a clean environment; and
(iv) will result in emissions that are lower than the average
emissions for the PJM region.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.